Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; GREEN HYDROGEN PROJECT.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $3,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account in the special revenue fund under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the city of St. Cloud for the Green Hydrogen Project to incorporate a battery and renewable energy system. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end